North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-34 Beef Promotion Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-34-01.
Purposes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-03.
North Dakota beef commission — Appointments — Vacancies — Qualifications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-04.
Nomination of members. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-05.
Powers and duties of commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-06.
Meetings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-07.
Compensation — Expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-08.
Assessment for sale of cattle — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-09.
Manner of deductions — Payments of assessments to beef commission — Collections. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-10.
Remittance of assessments collected — Penalties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-11.
Refund of assessments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-12.
Title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-13.
Cattle purchasers — List of sellers to commission — Certain records exempt from disclosure — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-34-14.
Records of cattle transactions — Inspection by commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.